Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.235

Cash or other security in lieu of surety bond—Rules.

In lieu of the surety bond required under the provisions of this chapter, an applicant or licensee may file with the director a deposit consisting of cash or other security acceptable to the director. The director may adopt rules necessary for the administration of such security.

[ 2003 c 326 s 77; 1973 c 142 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.